Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Nonprofit Rural Electrification Membership Corporations

46-3-70.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 6, effective July 1, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 46/HB 737, effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, designated Code Section 46-3-70 as reserved.

46-3-71 through 46-3-97.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 6, effective July 1, 1981.